Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 2. Unlicensed Programs.

§ 63.2-1715.
Exemptions from licensure.

No person to whom parental and legal custodial powers have been delegated pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

20-166

et seq.) of Title 20 shall be required to obtain a license to operate an independent foster home or approval as a foster parent from the Commissioner.

Officers, employees, or agents of the Commonwealth, or of any county, city, or town acting within the scope of their authority as such, who serve as or maintain a child-placing agency shall not be required to be licensed.

History.

1993, cc. 730, 742, § 63.1-196.001; 1994, cc. 837, 940; 1999, c. 454; 2000, cc. 61, 1058; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 467; 2006, c. 725; 2011, c. 363; 2014, c. 130; 2016, c. 442; 2017, c. 748; 2018, cc. 189, 244, 810; 2019, cc. 297, 667; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Cross references.

As to national criminal background checks by businesses and organizations regarding employees or volunteers providing care to children, the elderly and disabled, see §

19.2-392.02

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 810, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

Acts 2018, c. 810, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services shall develop and establish a process to gather and track aggregate data regarding child injuries and deaths that occur at child day programs exempt from licensure.”

Acts 2018, c. 810, cl. 4 provides: “That, notwithstanding the provisions of this act, all child day programs that enter into a contract with the Department of Social Services or a local department of social services to provide child care services funded by the Child Care and Development Block Grant shall comply with all applicable requirements imposed by federal law or regulation.”

Acts 2018, c. 810, cl. 5 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services shall assess the need for different standards governing child day programs that are exempt from licensure pursuant to §

63.2-1716

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and other child day programs that are exempt from licensure and shall report his findings and conclusions to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by December 1, 2018.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “children who are at least four years of age and are enrolled in public school or a preschool program” for “school-age children who are enrolled in public school” in subdivision B 7 and deleted subdivision B 8 which read “A child day program offered by a local school division, staffed by local school division employees, and attended by children who are at least four years of age and are enrolled in public school or a preschool program within such school division. Such programs shall be subject to safety and supervisory standards established by the local school board” to conform amendments by Acts 2018, cc. 189, 244 and 810.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 357 H, as amended by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, and as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “1. A child day program that operates for children of essential personnel or those who have been identified as needing in-person services, who are in need of child care as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, shall be exempt from licensure. Programs operating under this emergency licensing exemption must file an exemption with the Department and abide by the requirements set forth in §

63.2-1715

(C) and (D), Code of Virginia. The Commissioner shall have the authority to inspect these programs only upon receipt of a complaint, except as otherwise provided by law.

“2. An instructional program operating under §

63.2-1715

(A), Code of Virginia solely for children of essential personnel must file with the Commissioner a statement indicating the intent to operate the program and identifying that the program will operate solely for the children of essential personnel or those who have been identified as needing in-person services. All emergency child care programs shall follow Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and Virginia Department of Health guidance on safety measures to prevent the spread of COVID-19.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 357 J, as amended by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, and as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Any public or accredited private school may operate emergency child care for preschool or school aged children of essential personnel or those who have been identified as needing in-person services during a declared state or local emergency due to COVID-19. Such programs shall be exempt from licensure (§

63.2-1715

, Code of Virginia) and shall be subject to safety and supervisory standards, including background checks, established by the local school division or accredited private school offering the program. All emergency child care programs shall follow Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and Virginia Department of Health guidance on safety measures to prevent the spread of COVID-19.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 467 substituted “12” for “twelve,” “20” for “twenty,” “25” for “twenty-five,” and “30” for “thirty” throughout the section; and substituted “the American Montessori Society” for “Standards for the American Montessori Society Accreditation” in subdivision A 12.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 725 added subdivision A 13.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 363, in the first sentence of subdivision A 2, inserted “school-aged” following “or guardian” and added “regardless of (i) such program’s location or the number of days per week of its operation; (ii) the provision of transportation services, including drop-off and pick-up times; or (iii) the scheduling of breaks for snacks, homework, or other activities” at the end.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 130, added subdivision A 14.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 442, in subdivision A 6, deleted “public and” preceding “private schools”; and rewrote subdivision A 7, which read “Education and care programs provided by public schools that are not exempt pursuant to subdivision A 6 shall be regulated by the State Board of Education using regulations that incorporate, but may exceed, the regulations for child day centers licensed by the Commissioner.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 748 rewrote subdivision A 12, which formerly read: “A certified preschool or nursery school program operated by a private school that is accredited by a statewide accrediting organization recognized by the State Board of Education or accredited by the National Association for the Education of Young Children’s National Academy of Early Childhood Programs; the Association of Christian Schools International; the American Association of Christian Schools; the National Early Childhood Program Accreditation; the National Accreditation Council for Early Childhood Professional Personnel and Programs; the International Academy for Private Education; the American Montessori Society; the International Accreditation and Certification of Childhood Educators, Programs, and Trainers; or the National Accreditation Commission that complies with the provisions of § 63.2-1717.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 189 and 244 are identical, and added subdivision B 8.

The 2018 amendment by c. 810, effective July 1, 2019, inserted the introductory paragraph of subsection B and transferred and redesignated subdivisions A 1, 2, 5, 11, 12, 13, as subdivisions B 1 through 6, added subdivision B 7 and subsections C through E and made related changes; in the introductory paragraph of subsection A, inserted “programs are not” and inserted “and”;
in subdivision A 3, inserted “serve school-age children and that”; in subdivisions A 3 and A 4, inserted “provide services under”; and rewrote subdivision A 7.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 297 added subsection G, and redesignated former subsection G as subsection H.

The 2019 amendment by c. 667 added subdivision B 8.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted subsections A through F and redesignated the remaining subsections.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Licenses, § 5.

§§ 63.2-1716,
63.2-1717.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to child day center operated by religious institution exempt from licensure, annual statement and documentary evidence required, enforcement, injunctive relief; and see § 22.1-289.031.

For current provisions as to certification of preschool or nursery school programs operated by accredited private schools; provisional certification; annual statement and documentary evidence required; enforcement; injunctive relief, see § 22.1-289.032.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 860 and
861, effective July 1, 2021, repealed various sections in this chapter and recodified them. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts
2020, cc. 494,
495 have also been given effect in
§ 22.1-289.031, effective July 1, 2021.

Former §

63.2-1716

, pertaining to exemption from licensure of child day center operated by religious institution; requirement for annual statement and documentary evidence; enforcement; and injunctive relief, derived from 1979, c. 425,
§ 63.1-196.3;
1989, c. 258;
1993, cc. 730,
742;
2000, c. 283;
2002, c. 747;
2004, c. 113;
2006, c. 396;
2009, c. 258;
2018, cc. 6,
810;
2020, cc. 494,
495.

Former § 63.2-1717, pertaining to certification of preschool or nursery school programs operated by accredited private schools; provisional certification; annual statement and documentary evidence required; enforcement; injunctive relief, derived from
1993, cc. 730,
742,
§ 63.1-196.3:1;
1994, cc. 837,
940;
1999, c. 454;
2002, c. 747;
2003, c. 467;
2017, cc. 748,
809;
2018, cc. 99,
107.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Licenses, § 4.

§ 63.2-1718.
Inspection of unlicensed child or adult care operations; inspection warrant.

In order to perform his duties under this subtitle, the Commissioner may enter and inspect any unlicensed child or adult care operation with the consent of the owner or person in charge, or pursuant to a warrant. Administrative search warrants for inspections of child or adult care operations, based upon a petition demonstrating probable cause and supported by an affidavit, may be issued ex parte by any judge having authority to issue criminal warrants whose territorial jurisdiction includes the child or adult care operation to be inspected, if he is satisfied from the petition and affidavit that there is reasonable and probable cause for the inspection. The affidavit shall contain either a statement that consent to inspect has been sought and refused, or that facts and circumstances exist reasonably justifying the failure to seek such consent. Such facts may include, without limitation, past refusals to permit inspection or facts establishing reason to believe that seeking consent would provide an opportunity to conceal violations of statutes or regulations. Probable cause may be demonstrated by an affidavit showing probable cause to believe that the child or adult care operation is in violation of any provision of this subtitle or any regulation adopted pursuant to this subtitle, or upon a showing that the inspection is to be made pursuant to a reasonable administrative plan for the administration of this subtitle. The inspection of a child or adult care operation that has been the subject of a complaint pursuant to §

63.2-1728

shall have preeminent priority over any other inspections of child or adult care operations to be made by the Commissioner unless the complaint on its face or in the context of information known to the Commissioner discloses that the complaint has been brought to harass, to retaliate, or otherwise to achieve an improper purpose, and that the improper purpose casts serious doubt on the veracity of the complaint. After issuing a warrant under this section, the judge shall file the affidavit in the manner prescribed by §

19.2-54

. Such warrant shall be executed and returned to the clerk of the circuit court of the city or county wherein the inspection was made.

History.

1993, cc. 730, 742, § 63.1-198.04; 2002, c. 747; 2014, c. 354.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 354 added the last two sentences.